Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
DRINKING WATER REGULATIONS

Note

Part heading added by L 1987, c 297, §2(1).

§340E-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Administrator" means the
administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

"Contaminant" means any physical,
chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Director" means the director of
health or the director's authorized agent.

"Federal Act" means the Safe Drinking
Water Act, Public Law 93-523, as amended by the Safe Drinking Water Act
Amendments of 1986, Public Law 99-339, and the Safe Drinking Water Act
Amendments of 1996, Public Law 104-182. This Act is also known as Title XIV of
the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. §§300f et seq.).

"Federal agency" means any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States.

"Injection" means the subsurface
emplacement of any material, liquid, semi-solid, or solid, or any admixture
thereof, which may add a contaminant to underground waters.

"National primary drinking water
regulations" means primary drinking water regulations promulgated by the
administrator pursuant to the Federal Act.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, company, association, partnership, county, city and county, state,
or federal agency.

"Primary drinking water regulation"
means a regulation or rule which:

(1) Applies to public water systems;

(2) Specifies contaminants which, in the judgment of
the director, may have any adverse effect on the health of persons;

(3) Specifies for each contaminant either:

(A) A maximum contaminant level if, in the
judgment of the director, it is economically and technologically feasible to
ascertain the level of such contaminant in public water systems; or

(B) If, in the judgment of the director, it
is not economically or technologically feasible to ascertain the contaminant
level[,] each treatment technique known to the director which leads to a
reduction in the level of such contaminant sufficient to satisfy the
requirements of section 340E-2; and

(4) Contains criteria and procedures to assure a
supply of drinking water which dependably complies with such maximum
contaminant levels, including accepted methods for quality control and testing
procedures to insure compliance with such levels and proper operation and
maintenance of the system, and requirements as to:

(A) The minimum quality of water which may be
taken into the system; and

(B) Siting for new facilities for public
water systems.

Quality control and testing procedures published
in the Federal Register as guidance by the administrator may be adopted by the
director by rule as an alternative for public water systems to the quality
control and testing procedures listed in the corresponding and previously
promulgated federal primary drinking water regulation.

"Public water system" means a system
which provides water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed
conveyances if the system has at least fifteen service connections or regularly
serves at least twenty-five individuals. Such term includes:

(1) Any collection, treatment, storage, and
distribution facilities controlled by the system and used primarily in
connection with the system; and

(2) Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities
not under the control of, but which are used primarily in connection with the
system.

"Secondary drinking water regulation"
means a regulation or rule which applies to public water systems and which
specifies the maximum contaminant levels which, in the judgment of the
director, are requisite to protect the public welfare.

"Supplier of water" means any person
who owns or operates a public water system. [L 1976, c 84, pt of §1; gen ch
1985; am L 1987, c 165, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 218, §§4, 10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next